Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 4
DISCLOSURES AND FORM OF WRITING

5-10-401. Disclosures.

A lessor shall disclose to a lessee in a rental purchase agreement the information required either by this part 4 or by the provisions of the federal "Consumer Credit Protection Act" if the federal "Consumer Credit Protection Act" is amended to cover disclosure in a rental purchase agreement. In a rental purchase agreement, the lessor shall disclose the following:

A brief description of the leased property, sufficient to identify the property to the lessee and lessor;

The total number of payments and the total amount of such payments necessary to acquire ownership;

The number, amount, and timing of each payment, including taxes paid to or through the lessor;

A statement that the lessee will not own the property until the lessee has made the total number of payments and the total amount of such payments necessary to acquire ownership;

A statement of all other charges which the lessee may have to pay together with the amount of any such charge and the conditions under which any such charge shall be incurred;

If applicable, a statement that the lessee is responsible for the fair market value of the property if and as of the time it is lost, stolen, damaged, or destroyed;

A statement indicating whether the property is new or used; except that it is not a violation of this paragraph (g) to indicate that the property is used if it is actually new;

A statement that, at any time after the first lease payment is made, the lessee may acquire ownership of the property, and a brief explanation of the price, formula, or other method for determining the price at which the property may be purchased;

A brief explanation of the lessee's right to reinstate, and a description of the amount, or method of determining the amount, of any penalty or other charge for reinstatement as established in section 5-10-602;

The cash price of the property subject to the rental purchase agreement; and

A statement of the maintenance services, if any, the lessor will provide with respect to the property subject to the rental purchase agreement.

In addition to the disclosures required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the lessor shall also make the following disclosure:

NOTICE TO LESSEE -- READ BEFORE SIGNING

(1) DO NOT SIGN THIS BEFORE YOU READ THE ENTIRE AGREEMENT INCLUDING ANY WRITING ON THE REVERSE SIDE, EVEN IF OTHERWISE ADVISED.
(2) DO NOT SIGN THIS IF IT CONTAINS ANY BLANK SPACES.
(3) YOU ARE ENTITLED TO AN EXACT COPY OF ANY AGREEMENT YOU SIGN.
(4) YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO EXERCISE ANY EARLY BUY-OUT OPTION AS PROVIDED IN THIS AGREEMENT. EXERCISE OF THIS OPTION MAY RESULT IN A REDUCTION OF YOUR TOTAL COST TO ACQUIRE OWNERSHIP UNDER THIS AGREEMENT.
(5) IF YOU ELECT TO MAKE WEEKLY RATHER THAN MONTHLY PAYMENTS AND EXERCISE YOUR PURCHASE OPTION, YOU MAY PAY MORE FOR THE LEASED PROPERTY.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 368, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

Cross references:

For the federal "Consumer Credit Protection Act", see Pub.L. 90-321.

5-10-402. Form requirements.

The information required by this part 4:

Shall be disclosed in writing in a rental purchase agreement;

Shall be set forth clearly and conspicuously, in not less than eight point standard type;

Shall be set apart and not contain any information not directly related to the disclosures;

Shall be stated using words and phrases of common meaning;

Need not be contained in a single writing or made in the order set forth in this part 4; and

May be supplemented by additional information or explanations supplied by the lessor, so long as the additional information is not stated, utilized, or placed in a manner which will confuse the lessee or contradict, obscure, or distract attention from the required information. The additional information or explanations shall not have the effect of circumventing, evading, or unduly complicating the information required to be disclosed.

The lessor shall disclose all information required by this part 4 before the rental purchase agreement is consummated.

Before any payment is due, the lessor shall furnish the lessee with an exact copy of the rental purchase agreement, which shall be signed by the lessee and which shall evidence the lessee's agreement. If there is more than one lessee in a rental purchase agreement, delivery of a copy of the rental purchase agreement to one of the lessees constitutes compliance with this subsection (3).

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 370, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-403. Receipts.

The lessor shall furnish the lessee a written receipt for each payment made in cash or by any other method of payment that does not provide evidence of payment when any such payment is delivered in person during normal working hours.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 370, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.